Utah statutes.
63E-2-107.   Prohibited participation.

Except as specifically modified in its authorizing statute, each independent corporation may not participate in the:

(1)  issuance of bonds that are the obligation of the state; or

(2)  services provided to state agencies, including:

(a)  fuel dispensing;

(b)  motor pool services;

(c)  surplus property services;

(d)  information technology services; or

(e)  archive services.



Amended by Chapter 220, 2013 General Session

